Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2233
Sheriff; service of process.

It shall be the duty of every sheriff to serve and execute all warrants, writs, precepts, executions, and other legal process to him or her directed and delivered.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 172, p. 324;

C.S.1929, § 22-1502;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,173;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,173;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 41;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-596;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 17.